Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 2

Joint Operations

42-3-201. Joint operations authorized.

For the purposes of this part, unless otherwise qualified:

“Governing body” includes the commissioners of an authority, the governing body of a municipality and the head of an agency of a state or the United States if the public agency is other than an authority or municipality; and

“Public agency” includes municipality and authority, each as defined in this chapter, any agency of the state government and of the United States, and any municipality, political subdivision and agency of an adjoining state.

All powers, privileges and authority granted by this chapter may be exercised and enjoyed by an authority jointly with any public agency of this state, and jointly with any public agency of any adjoining state or of the United States to the extent that the laws of the other state or of the United States permit such joint exercise of enjoyment.

Any agency of the state government, when acting jointly with any authority, may exercise and enjoy all the powers, privileges and authority conferred by this chapter upon an authority.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 14; T.C.A., § 42-615.

Cross-References. Contracts and mutual aid agreements, §6-54-601.

Loans for airports, title 4, ch. 31, part 6.

Mutual aid agreements, §6-54-307.

42-3-202. Agreement as to joint operation.

Any two (2) or more public agencies may enter into agreements with each other for joint action pursuant to this part.

Each agreement shall specify its duration, the proportionate interest that each public agency shall have in the property, facilities and privileges involved in the joint undertaking, the proportion of costs of operation, etc., to be borne by each public agency, and such other terms as are deemed necessary or required by law.

The agreement may also provide for amendments and termination; disposal of all or any of the property, facilities and privileges jointly owned, prior to, or at such time as the property, facilities and privileges, or any part of the property, facilities and privileges, cease to be used for the purposes provided in this chapter, or upon termination of the agreement; the distribution of the proceeds received upon any disposal, and of any funds or other property jointly owned and undisposed of; the assumption or payment of any indebtedness arising from the joint undertaking that remains unpaid upon the disposal of all assets or upon a termination of the agreement; and such other provisions as may be necessary or convenient.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 14; T.C.A., § 42-616.

42-3-203. Joint board.

Public agencies acting jointly pursuant to this part shall create a joint board, which shall consist of members appointed by the governing body of each participating public agency.

The number to be appointed, their terms and compensation, if any, shall be provided for in the joint agreement.

Each joint board shall organize, select officers for such terms as are fixed by the agreement, and adopt and amend from time to time rules for its own procedure.

The joint board shall have powers, as agent of the participating public agencies, to plan, acquire, establish, develop, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, protect and police any airport or air navigation facility or avigation easement or airport hazard to be jointly acquired, controlled and operated, and the board may be authorized by the participating public agencies to exercise on behalf of its constituent public agencies all the powers of each with respect to the airport, air navigation facility, avigation easement or airport hazard, subject to the limitations of § 42-3-204.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 14; T.C.A., § 42-617.

42-3-204. Limitations on joint board.

Exemptions. The total expenditures to be made by the joint board for any purpose in any calendar year shall be as determined by a budget approved by the constituent public agencies on or before the preceding fiscal year, or as otherwise specifically authorized by the constituent public agencies.

Acquisitions Beyond Sums Allotted. No airport, air navigation facility, avigation easement, airport hazard, or real or personal property, the cost of which is in excess of sums fixed therefor by the joint agreement or allotted in the annual budget, may be acquired, established or developed by the joint board without the approval of the governing bodies of its constituent public agencies.

Eminent Domain. Eminent domain proceedings under this part may be instituted by the joint board only by authority of the governing bodies of the constituent public agencies of the joint board. If so authorized, such proceedings shall be instituted in the names of the constituent public agencies jointly, and the property so acquired shall be held by the public agencies as tenants in common.

Disposal of Real Property. The joint board shall not dispose of any airport, air navigation facility, avigation easement or real property under its jurisdiction except with the consent of the governing bodies of its constituent public agencies; provided, that the joint board may, without such consent, enter into contracts, leases or other arrangements contemplated by § 42-3-112.

Regulations and Orders. Any resolutions, rules, regulations or orders of the joint board dealing with subjects authorized by § 42-3-112 shall become effective only upon approval of the governing bodies of the constituent public agencies; provided, that upon approval, the resolutions, rules, regulations or orders of the joint board shall have the same force and effect in the territories or jurisdictions involved as the ordinances, resolutions, rules, regulations or orders of each public agency would have in its own territory or jurisdiction.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 14; T.C.A., § 42-618.

42-3-205. Joint fund.

For the purpose of providing the joint board with moneys for the necessary expenditures in carrying out this part, a joint fund shall be created and maintained, into which shall be deposited the share of each of the constituent public agencies as provided by the joint agreement. Any federal, state or other grants, contributions or loans, and the revenues obtained from the joint ownership, control and operation of any airport or air navigation facility under the jurisdiction of the joint board shall be paid into the joint fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be made by order of the board, subject to the limitations prescribed in §42-3-204.

Acts 1957, ch. 376, § 14; T.C.A., § 42-619.

Cited: Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Dunn, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 130 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Fenimore, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 131 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Ingrum, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 132 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Lassiter, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 133 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Gregory, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 134 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Reese, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 135 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Camilla Jean Palmer Revocable Living Trust, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 136 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Law, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 137 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. McKee, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 138 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Pryor, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 139 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006); Midwestern Gas Transmission Co. v. Marcum, — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 140 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 24, 2006).